California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 the Board of Registered Nursing to determine if any report has been made pursuant to Section 805 indicating that the applying physician and surgeon, psychologist, podiatrist, dentist, or nurse practitioner, has been denied staff privileges, been removed from a medical staff, or had their staff privileges restricted as provided in Section 805. The request shall include the name and California license number of the physician and surgeon, psychologist, podiatrist, dentist, or nurse practitioner. Furnishing of a copy of the 805 report shall not cause the 805 report to be a public record.

(b) Upon a request made by, or on behalf of, an institution described in subdivision (a) or its medical staff, the board shall furnish a copy of any report made pursuant to Section 805 as well as any additional exculpatory or explanatory information submitted
 electronically to the board by the licensee pursuant to subdivision (f) of that section. However, the board shall not send a copy of a report (1) if the denial, removal, or restriction was imposed solely because of the failure to complete medical records, (2) if the board has found the information reported is without merit, (3) if a court finds, in a final judgment, that the peer review, as defined in Section 805, resulting in the report was conducted in bad faith and the licensee who is the subject of the report notifies the board of that finding, or (4) if a period of three years has elapsed since the report was submitted. This three-year period shall be tolled during any period the licentiate has obtained a judicial order precluding disclosure of the report, unless the board is finally and permanently precluded by judicial order from disclosing the report. If a request is received by
 the board while the board is subject to a judicial order limiting or precluding disclosure, the board shall provide a disclosure to any qualified requesting party as soon as practicable after the judicial order is no longer in force.

If the board fails to advise the institution within 30 working days following its request for a report required by this section, the institution may grant or renew staff privileges for the physician and surgeon, psychologist, podiatrist, dentist, or nurse practitioner.

(c) Any institution described in subdivision (a) or its medical staff that violates subdivision (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 265, Sec. 3.   (AB 890)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

805.6.

(a) The Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, and the Dental Board of California shall establish a system of electronic notification that is either initiated by the board or can be accessed by qualified subscribers, and that is designed to achieve early notification to qualified recipients of the existence of new reports that are filed pursuant to Section 805.

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall notify the appropriate licensing agency of any reporting violations pursuant to Section 805.

(c) The
 Department of Managed Health Care shall notify the appropriate licensing agency of any reporting violations pursuant to Section 805.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 15.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

805.7.

(a) The Medical Board of California shall work with interested parties in the pursuit and establishment of a pilot program, similar to those proposed by the Citizens Advocacy Center, of early detection of potential quality problems and resolutions through informal educational interventions.

(b) The Medical Board of California shall report to the Legislature its evaluation and findings and shall include recommendations regarding the statewide implementation of this pilot program before April 1, 2004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1012, Sec. 4.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

805.8.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Agency” means the relevant state licensing agency with regulatory jurisdiction over a healing arts licensee listed in paragraph (2).

(2) “Healing arts licensee” or “licensee” means a licensee licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) or any initiative act referred to in that division. “Healing arts licensee” or “licensee” also includes a person authorized to practice medicine pursuant to Sections 2064.5, 2113, and 2168.

(3) “Health care facility” means a clinic or health facility licensed or exempt from licensure pursuant to Division 2
 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) “Other entity” includes, but is not limited to, a postsecondary educational institution as defined in Section 66261.5 of the Education Code.

(5) “Sexual misconduct” means inappropriate contact or communication of a sexual nature.

(b) A health care facility or other entity that makes any arrangement under which a healing arts licensee is allowed to practice or provide care for patients shall file a report of any allegation of sexual abuse or sexual misconduct made against a healing arts licensee by a patient, if the patient or the patient’s representative makes the allegation, in writing, to the agency within 15 days of receiving the written allegation of sexual abuse or sexual misconduct. An arrangement under which a licensee is allowed to practice or
 provide care for patients includes, but is not limited to, full staff privileges, active staff privileges, limited staff privileges, auxiliary staff privileges, provisional staff privileges, temporary staff privileges, courtesy staff privileges, locum tenens arrangements, and contractual arrangements to provide professional services, including, but not limited to, arrangements to provide outpatient services.

(c) The report provided pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be kept confidential and shall not be subject to discovery, except that the information may be reviewed as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 800 and may be disclosed in any subsequent disciplinary hearing conducted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(d) A willful failure to file the report described in
 subdivision (b) shall be punishable by a fine, not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per violation, that shall be paid by the health care facility or other entity subject to subdivision (b). The fine may be imposed in any civil or administrative action or proceeding brought by or on behalf of any agency having regulatory jurisdiction over the licensee regarding whom the report was or should have been filed. If the person who is designated or otherwise required to file the report under this section is a licensed physician and surgeon, the action or proceeding shall be brought by the Medical Board of California. If the person who is designated or otherwise required to file the report required under this section is a licensed doctor of podiatric medicine, the action or proceeding shall be brought by the Podiatric Medical Board of California. The fine shall be paid to that agency, but not expended until appropriated by the Legislature. A violation of this subdivision may constitute unprofessional
 conduct by the licensee. A person who is alleged to have violated this subdivision may assert any defense available at law. As used in this subdivision, “willful” means a voluntary and intentional violation of a known legal duty.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any failure to file the report described in subdivision (b) is punishable by a fine, not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per violation, that shall be paid by the health care facility or other entity subject to subdivision (b). The fine may be imposed in any civil or administrative action or proceeding brought by or on behalf of any agency having regulatory jurisdiction over the person regarding whom the report was or should have been filed. If the person who is designated or otherwise required to file the report required under this section is a licensed physician and surgeon, the action or proceeding shall be brought by the Medical Board of California. If the person
 who is designated or otherwise required to file the report required under this section is a licensed doctor of podiatric medicine, the action or proceeding shall be brought by the Podiatric Medical Board of California. The fine shall be paid to that agency, but not expended until appropriated by the Legislature. The amount of the fine imposed, not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per violation, shall be proportional to the severity of the failure to report and shall differ based upon written findings, including whether the failure to file caused harm to a patient or created a risk to patient safety; whether any person who is designated or otherwise required by law to file the report required under this section exercised due diligence despite the failure to file or whether the person knew or should have known that a report required under this section would not be filed; whether there has been a prior failure to file a report required under this section; and whether a report was filed with another
 state agency or law enforcement. The amount of the fine imposed may also differ based on whether a health care facility is a small or rural hospital, as defined in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) A person, including an employee or individual contracted or subcontracted to provide health care services, a health care facility, or other entity shall not incur any civil or criminal liability as a result of making a report required by this section.

(g) The agency shall investigate the circumstances underlying a report received pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 4.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

805.9.

(a) A health facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall not deny staff privileges to, remove from medical staff, or restrict the staff privileges of a person licensed by a healing arts board in this state on the basis of a civil judgment, criminal conviction, or disciplinary action imposed by another state if that judgment, conviction, or disciplinary action is based solely on the application of another state’s law that interferes with a person’s right to receive sensitive services that would be lawful if provided in this state.

(b) This section does not apply to a civil judgment, criminal conviction,
 or disciplinary action imposed in another state based upon conduct in another state that would subject a licensee to a similar claim, charge, or action under the laws of this state.

(c) For purposes of this section:

 (1) “Healing arts board” means any board, division, or examining committee in the Department of Consumer Affairs that licenses or certifies health professionals.

(2) “Sensitive services” has the same meaning as in Section 56.05
 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 258, Sec. 1.   (AB 1707)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

806.

Each agency in the department receiving reports pursuant to the preceding sections shall prepare a statistical report based upon these records for presentation to the Legislature not later than 30 days after the commencement of each regular session of the Legislature, including by the type of peer review body, and, where applicable, type of health care facility, the number of reports received and a summary of administrative and disciplinary action taken with respect to these reports and any recommendations for corrective legislation if the agency considers legislation to be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 614, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

807.

Each agency in the department shall notify every person licensed, certified or holding similar authority issued by it, and the department shall notify every insurance company doing business in this state and every institution mentioned in Section 805 of the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

808.

For purposes of this article, reports affecting respiratory care practitioners required to be filed under Sections 801, 802, and 803 shall be filed with the Respiratory Care Board of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1274, Sec. 1.7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

808.5.

For purposes of this article, reports affecting psychologists required to be filed under Sections 801, 801.1, 802, 803, 803.5, and 803.6 shall be filed with the Board of Psychology of the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

809.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares the following:

(1) In 1986, Congress enacted the federal Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 1986 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11101 et seq.), to encourage physicians and surgeons to engage in effective professional peer review, but giving each state the opportunity to “opt-out” of some of the provisions of the federal act.

(2) Because of deficiencies in the federal act and the possible adverse interpretations by the courts of the federal act, it is preferable for California to “opt-out” of the federal act and design its own peer review system.

(3) Peer review,
 fairly conducted, is essential to preserving the highest standards of medical practice.

(4) Peer review that is not conducted fairly results in harm to both patients and healing arts practitioners by limiting access to care.

(5) Peer review, fairly conducted, will aid the appropriate state licensing boards in their responsibility to regulate and discipline errant healing arts practitioners.

(6) To protect the health and welfare of the people of California, it is the policy of the State of California to exclude, through the peer review mechanism as provided for by California law, those healing arts practitioners who provide substandard care or who engage in professional misconduct, regardless of the effect of that exclusion on competition.

(7) It is the
 intent of the Legislature that peer review of professional health care services be done efficiently, on an ongoing basis, and with an emphasis on early detection of potential quality problems and resolutions through informal educational interventions.

(8) Sections 809 to 809.8, inclusive, shall not affect the respective responsibilities of the organized medical staff or the governing body of an acute care hospital with respect to peer review in the acute care hospital setting. It is the intent of the Legislature that written provisions implementing Sections 809 to 809.8, inclusive, in the acute care hospital setting shall be included in medical staff bylaws that shall be adopted by a vote of the members of the organized medical staff and shall be subject to governing body approval, which approval shall not be withheld unreasonably.

(9) (A) The Legislature
 thus finds and declares that the laws of this state pertaining to the peer review of healing arts practitioners shall apply in lieu of Section 11101 and following of Title 42 of the United States Code, because the laws of this state provide a more careful articulation of the protections for both those undertaking peer review activity and those subject to review, and better integrate public and private systems of peer review. Therefore, California exercises its right to opt out of specified provisions of the federal Health Care Quality Improvement Act relating to professional review actions, pursuant to Section 11111(c)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code. This election shall not affect the availability of any immunity under California law.

(B) The Legislature further declares that it is not the intent or purpose of Sections 809 to 809.8, inclusive, to opt out of any mandatory national data bank established pursuant to Section 11131 and
 following of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) For the purpose of this section and Sections 809.1 to 809.8, inclusive, “healing arts practitioner” or “licentiate” means a physician and surgeon, podiatrist, clinical psychologist, marriage and family therapist, clinical social worker, professional clinical counselor, or dentist; and “peer review body” means a peer review body as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 805, and includes any designee of the peer review body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 10.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

809.05.

It is the policy of this state that peer review be performed by licentiates. This policy is subject to the following limitations:

(a) The governing bodies of acute care hospitals have a legitimate function in the peer review process. In all peer review matters, the governing body shall give great weight to the actions of peer review bodies and, in no event, shall act in an arbitrary or capricious manner.

(b) In those instances in which the peer review body’s failure to investigate, or initiate disciplinary action, is contrary to the weight of the evidence, the governing body shall have the authority to direct the peer review body to initiate an investigation or a disciplinary action, but only after consultation with the peer review body. No such action shall be taken in an unreasonable manner.

(c) In the event the peer review body fails to take action in response to a direction from the governing body, the governing body shall have the authority to take action against a licentiate. Such action shall only be taken after written notice to the peer review body and shall fully comply with the procedures and rules applicable to peer review proceedings established by Sections 809.1 to 809.6, inclusive.

(d) A governing body and the medical staff shall act exclusively in the interest of maintaining and enhancing quality patient care.

(e) It is not the intent or purpose of this section to prohibit or discourage public members on state licensing boards and medical quality review committees from participating in disciplinary actions as authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 354, Sec. 2.   Note: Stats. 1989, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.5, would have added a similar section on Jan. 1, 1990, but that action was effectively nullified by Stats. 1989, Ch. 354, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

809.08.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the sharing of information between peer review bodies is essential to protect the public health.

(b) Upon receipt of reasonable processing costs, a peer review body shall respond to the request of another peer review body and produce relevant peer review information about a licentiate that was subject to peer review by the responding peer review body for a medical disciplinary cause or reason. The responding peer review body shall determine the manner by which to produce such information and may elect to do so through (1) a written summary of relevant peer review information or (2) a relevant peer review record. Relevant peer review information or peer
 review record includes, but is not limited to, allegations and findings, explanatory or exculpatory information submitted by the licentiate, any conclusions made, any actions taken, and the reasons for those actions, to the extent not otherwise prohibited by applicable federal or state law. The information shall not identify any person except the licentiate. The information produced by a peer review body pursuant to this section shall be used solely for peer review purposes and shall not be subject to discovery to the extent provided in Sections 1156.1 and 1157 of the Evidence Code and any other applicable provisions of law. All relevant peer review information produced pursuant to this section shall be made available to the licentiate by the requesting peer review body in accordance with Section 809.2.

(c) The responding peer review body
 acting in good faith is not subject to civil or criminal liability for providing information to the requesting peer review body pursuant to this section. The peer review body responding to the request shall be entitled to all confidentiality protections and privileges provided by law as to the information disclosed pursuant to this section. Prior to the release of any peer review information pursuant to this section, the requesting peer review body shall, upon request, sign a mutually agreeable peer review sharing agreement with the responding peer review body, and shall also indemnify the responding peer review body for any and all claims, demands, liabilities, losses, damages, costs, and expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees, resulting in any manner, directly or indirectly, from the receiving peer review body’s improper release or disclosure of information shared pursuant to this section.

(d) Prior to the release of any peer review
 information pursuant to this section, the licentiate under review by the peer review body requesting information pursuant to this section shall, upon request, release the responding peer review body, its members, and the health care entity for which the responding peer review body conducts peer reviews, from liability for the disclosure of information in compliance with this section.

(e) The responding peer review body is not obligated to produce the relevant peer review information pursuant to this section unless both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The licentiate provides a release, as described in subdivision (d), that is acceptable to the responding peer review body.

(2) The requesting peer review body signs a mutually agreeable peer review sharing agreement, as described in subdivision (c), with the
 responding peer review body.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   (AB 655)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

809.1.

(a) A licentiate who is the subject of a final proposed action of a peer review body for which a report is required to be filed under Section 805 shall be entitled to written notice as set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c). For the purposes of this section, the “final proposed action” shall be the final decision or recommendation of the peer review body after informal investigatory activity or prehearing meetings, if any.

(b) The peer review body shall give the licentiate written notice of the final proposed action. This notice shall include all the following information:

(1) That an action against the licentiate has been proposed by the peer review body which, if adopted, shall be taken and reported pursuant to Section 805.

(2) The final proposed action.

(3) That the licentiate has the right to request a hearing on the final proposed action.

(4) The time limit, within which to request such a hearing.

(c) If a hearing is requested on a timely basis, the peer review body shall give the licentiate a written notice stating all of the following:

(1) The reasons for the final proposed action taken or recommended, including the acts or omissions with which the licentiate is charged.

(2) The place, time, and date of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 336, Sec. 2.   Effective September 11, 1989.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

809.2.

If a licentiate timely requests a hearing concerning a final proposed action for which a report is required to be filed under Section 805, the following shall apply:

(a) The hearing shall be held, as determined by the peer review body, before a trier of fact, which shall be an arbitrator or arbitrators selected by a process mutually acceptable to the licentiate and the peer review body, or before a panel of unbiased individuals who shall gain no direct financial benefit from the outcome, who have not acted as an accuser, investigator, factfinder, or initial decisionmaker in the same matter, and which shall include, where feasible, an individual practicing the same specialty as the licentiate.

(b) If a hearing officer is selected to preside at a hearing held before a panel, the hearing officer shall gain no direct financial benefit from the outcome, shall not act as a prosecuting officer or advocate, and shall not be entitled to vote.

(c) The licentiate shall have the right to a reasonable opportunity to voir dire the panel members and any hearing officer, and the right to challenge the impartiality of any member or hearing officer. Challenges to the impartiality of any member or hearing officer shall be ruled on by the presiding officer, who shall be the hearing officer if one has been selected.

(d) The licentiate shall have the right to inspect and copy at the licentiate’s expense any documentary information relevant to the charges which the peer review body has in its possession or under its control, as soon as practicable after the receipt of the licentiate’s request for a hearing. The peer review body shall have the right to inspect and copy at the peer review body’s expense any documentary information relevant to the charges which the licentiate has in his or her possession or control as soon as practicable after receipt of the peer review body’s request. The failure by either party to provide access to this information at least 30 days before the hearing shall constitute good cause for a continuance. The right to inspect and copy by either party does not extend to confidential information referring solely to individually identifiable licentiates, other than the licentiate under review. The arbitrator or presiding officer shall consider and rule upon any request for access to information, and may impose any safeguards the protection of the peer review process and justice requires.

(e) When ruling upon requests for access to information and determining the relevancy thereof, the arbitrator or presiding officer shall, among other factors, consider the following:

(1) Whether the information sought may be introduced to support or defend the charges.

(2) The exculpatory or inculpatory nature of the information sought, if any. 

(3) The burden imposed on the party in possession of the information sought, if access is granted.

(4) Any previous requests for access to information submitted or resisted by the parties to the same proceeding.

(f) At the request of either side, the parties shall exchange lists of witnesses expected to testify and copies of all documents expected to be introduced at the hearing. Failure to disclose the identity of a witness or produce copies of all documents expected to be produced at least 10 days before the commencement of the hearing shall constitute good cause for a continuance.

(g) Continuances shall be granted upon agreement of the parties or by the arbitrator or presiding officer on a showing of good cause.

(h) A hearing under this section shall be commenced within 60 days after receipt of the request for hearing, and the peer review process shall be completed within a reasonable time, after a licentiate receives notice of a final proposed action or an immediate suspension or restriction of clinical privileges, unless the arbitrator or presiding officer issues a written decision finding that the licentiate failed to comply with subdivisions (d) and (e) in a timely manner, or consented to the delay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 336, Sec. 3.   Effective September 11, 1989.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

809.3.

(a) During a hearing concerning a final proposed action for which reporting is required to be filed under Section 805, both parties shall have all of the following rights:

(1) To be provided with all of the information made available to the trier of fact.

(2) To have a record made of the proceedings, copies of which may be obtained by the licentiate upon payment of any reasonable charges associated with the preparation thereof.

(3) To call, examine, and cross-examine witnesses.

(4) To present and rebut evidence determined by the arbitrator or presiding officer to be relevant.

(5) To submit a written statement at the close of the hearing.

(b) The burden of presenting evidence and proof during the hearing shall be as follows:

(1) The peer review body shall have the initial duty to present evidence which supports the charge or recommended action.

(2) Initial applicants shall bear the burden of persuading the trier of fact by a preponderance of the evidence of their qualifications by producing information which allows for adequate evaluation and resolution of reasonable doubts concerning their current qualifications for staff privileges, membership, or employment. Initial applicants shall not be permitted to introduce information not produced upon request of the peer review body during the application process, unless the initial applicant establishes that the information could not have been produced previously in the exercise of reasonable diligence.

(3) Except as provided above for initial applicants, the peer review body shall bear the burden of persuading the trier of fact by a preponderance of the evidence that the action or recommendation is reasonable and warranted.

(c) The peer review body shall adopt written provisions governing whether a licentiate shall have the option of being represented by an attorney at the licentiate’s expense. No peer review body shall be represented by an attorney if the licentiate is not so represented, except dental professional society peer review bodies may be represented by an attorney provided that the peer review body grants each licentiate the option of being represented by an attorney at the licentiate’s expense, even if the licentiate declines to be represented by an attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

809.4.

(a) Upon the completion of a hearing concerning a final proposed action for which a report is required to be filed under Section 805, the licentiate and the peer review body involved have the right to receive all of the following:

(1) A written decision of the trier of fact, including findings of fact and a conclusion articulating the connection between the evidence produced at the hearing and the decision reached.

(2) A written explanation of the procedure for appealing the decision, if any appellate mechanism exists.

(b) If an appellate mechanism is provided, it need not provide for de novo review, but it shall include the following mimimum rights for both parties:

(1) The right to appear and respond.

(2) The right to be represented by an attorney or any other representative designated by the party.

(3) The right to receive the written decision of the appellate body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 336, Sec. 5.   Effective September 11, 1989.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

809.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 809 to 809.4, inclusive, a peer review body may immediately suspend or restrict clinical privileges of a licentiate where the failure to take that action may result in an imminent danger to the health of any individual, provided that the licentiate is subsequently provided with the notice and hearing rights set forth in Sections 809.1 to 809.4, inclusive, or, with respect to organizations specified in Section 809.7, with the rights specified in that section.

(b) When no person authorized by the peer review body is available to summarily suspend or restrict clinical privileges under circumstances specified in subdivision (a), the governing body of an acute care hospital, or its designee, may immediately suspend a licentiate’s clinical privileges if a failure to summarily suspend those privileges is likely to result in an imminent danger to the health of any individual, provided the governing body of the acute care hospital has, before the suspension, made reasonable attempts to contact the peer review body. A suspension by the governing body of an acute care hospital which has not been ratified by the peer review body within two working days, excluding weekends and holidays, after the suspension shall terminate automatically.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 332, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

809.6.

(a) The parties are bound by any additional notice and hearing provisions contained in any applicable professional society or medical staff bylaws which are not inconsistent with Sections 809.1 to 809.4, inclusive.

(b) The parties are bound by any additional notice and hearing provisions contained in any applicable agreement or contract between the licentiate and peer review body or health care entity which are not inconsistent with Sections 809.1 to 809.4, inclusive.

(c) The provisions of Sections 809.1 to 809.4, inclusive, may not be waived in any instrument specified in subdivision (a) or (b) for a final proposed action for which a report is required to be filed under Section 805.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 336, Sec. 7.   Effective September 11, 1989.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

809.7.

Sections 809.1 to 809.4, inclusive, shall not apply to peer review proceedings conducted in state or county hospitals, in hospitals owned by, operated by, or licensed to the Regents of the University of California or any of its subsidiary corporations which serve as a primary teaching facility, or in health facilities which serve as the primary teaching facility for medical schools approved pursuant to Section 2084. In addition, Sections 809.1 to 809.4, inclusive, shall not apply to licentiates engaged in postgraduate medical education under the auspices of a medical school approved pursuant to Section 2084. This section shall not affect the obligation to afford due process of law to licentiates involved in peer review proceedings in these hospitals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 336, Sec. 8.   Effective September 11, 1989.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

809.8.

Nothing in Sections 809 to 809.7, inclusive, shall affect the availability of judicial review under Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure nor the provisions relating to discovery and testimony in Section 1157 of the Evidence Code or Sections 1370 and 1370.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 336, Sec. 9.   Effective September 11, 1989.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

809.9.

In any suit brought to challenge an action taken or a restriction imposed which is required to be reported pursuant to Section 805, the court shall, at the conclusion of the action, award to a substantially prevailing party the cost of the suit, including a reasonable attorney’s fee, if the other party’s conduct in bringing, defending, or litigating the suit was frivolous, unreasonable, without foundation, or in bad faith. For the purposes of this section, a defendant shall not be considered to have substantially prevailed when the plaintiff obtains an award for damages or permanent injunctive or declaratory relief. For the purpose of this section, a plaintiff shall not be considered to have substantially prevailed when the plaintiff does not obtain an award of damages or permanent injunctive or declaratory relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 336, Sec. 9.5.   Effective September 11, 1989.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Insurance Fraud [810. - 810.]

810.

(a) It shall constitute unprofessional conduct and grounds for disciplinary action, including suspension or revocation of a license or certificate, for a health care professional to do any of the following in connection with their professional activities:

(1) Knowingly present or cause to be presented any false or fraudulent claim for the payment of a loss under a contract of insurance.

(2) Knowingly prepare, make, or subscribe any writing, with intent to present or use the same, or to allow it to be presented or used in support of any false or fraudulent claim.

(b) It shall constitute cause for revocation or suspension of a license or certificate for a health care professional to engage in any conduct prohibited under Section 1871.4 of the Insurance Code or Section 549 or 550 of the Penal Code.

(c) (1) It shall constitute cause for automatic suspension of a license or certificate issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600), Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000), Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3000), or Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4000), or pursuant to the Chiropractic Act or the Osteopathic Act, if a licensee or certificate holder has been convicted of any felony involving fraud committed by the licensee or certificate holder in conjunction with providing benefits covered by worker’s
 compensation insurance, or has been convicted of any felony involving Medi-Cal fraud committed by the licensee or certificate holder in conjunction with the Medi-Cal program, including the Denti-Cal element of the Medi-Cal program, pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000), or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The board shall convene a disciplinary hearing to determine whether or not the license or certificate shall be suspended, revoked, or some other disposition shall be considered, including, but not limited to, revocation with the opportunity to petition for reinstatement, suspension, or other limitations on the license or certificate as the board deems appropriate.

(2) It shall constitute cause for automatic suspension and for revocation of a license
 or certificate issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600), Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000), Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3000), or Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4000), or pursuant to the Chiropractic Act or the Osteopathic Act, if a licensee or certificate holder has more than one conviction of any felony arising out of separate prosecutions involving fraud committed by the licensee or certificate holder in conjunction with providing benefits covered by worker’s compensation insurance, or in conjunction with the Medi-Cal program, including the Denti-Cal element of the Medi-Cal program pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000), or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The board shall convene a disciplinary hearing to revoke the license or
 certificate and an order of revocation shall be issued unless the board finds mitigating circumstances to order some other disposition.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that paragraph (2) apply to a licensee or certificate holder who has one or more convictions prior to January 1, 2004, as provided in this subdivision.
